Arkansas, session 2025, SB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 28, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
18-28-232. Applicability — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "nonprofit organization" means:
(1) A corporation governed by Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 28
or Title 4, Chapter 33 to extent that it is applicable to nonprofit
corporations; or
(2) An organization exempt from federal taxation as a nonprofit
entity under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(a) or as
an exempt organization under §§ 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(12),
or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), 26 U.S.C.
§ 501(c)(4), 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6), 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(12), or 26 U.S.C. §
501(c)(19), as they existed on January 1, 2025.
(b)(1) A nonprofit organization that has an annual revenue of less
*ANS201*
03-13-2025 14:03:53 ANS201

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 SB283
than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall pay, deliver, or cause to be
paid or delivered to the administrator property that has been unclaimed for
one (1) year.
(2) The administrator shall have two (2) years to locate the
apparent owner of the property described under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section.
(3) If the property remains unclaimed after the period described
under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the property is presumed abandoned
and the administrator shall pay, deliver, or cause to be paid or delivered
the unclaimed property to the nonprofit organization.

/s/K. Hammer
























03-13-2025 14:03:53 ANS201